Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB563.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 189A.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person shall not operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle anywhere in
this state:
(a) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's breath or blood
taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle;
(b) While under the influence of alcohol;
(c) While under the influence of any other substance or combination of
substances which impairs one's driving ability;
(d) While the presence of a controlled substance listed in subsection (12) of this
section is detected in the blood, as measured by a scientifically reliable test, or
tests, taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control
of a motor vehicle;
(e) While under the combined influence of alcohol and any other substance which
impairs one's driving ability; or
(f) Having an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more as measured by a
scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person's breath or blood
taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a
motor vehicle, if the person is under the age of twenty-one (21).
(2) With the exception of the results of the tests administered pursuant to KRS
189A.103(7):
(a) If the sample of the person's blood or breath that is used to determine the
alcohol concentration thereof was obtained more than two (2) hours after
cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1943
test or tests shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(a) or (f) of this section. The results of the test or tests, however,
may be admissible in a prosecution under subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this
section; or
(b) If the sample of the person's blood that is used to determine the presence of a
controlled substance was obtained more than two (2) hours after cessation of
operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the test or tests
shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of
this section. The results of the test or tests, however, may be admissible in a
prosecution under subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(3) In any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section in which
the defendant is charged with having operated or been in physical control of a
motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, the alcohol concentration in the
defendant's blood as determined at the time of making analysis of his or her blood
or breath shall give rise to the following presumptions:
(a) If there was an alcohol concentration of less than 0.04[ based upon the
definition of alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005], it shall be presumed
that the defendant was not under the influence of alcohol; and
(b) If there was an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or greater but less than 0.08[
based upon the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS 189A.005], that
fact shall not constitute a presumption that the defendant either was or was not
under the influence of alcohol, but that fact may be considered, together with
other competent evidence, in determining the guilt or innocence of the
defendant.
[The provisions of ]This subsection shall not be construed as limiting the
introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the questions of
whether the defendant was under the influence of alcohol or other substances, in
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1943
any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section.
(4) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the fact that any person
charged with violation of subsection (1) of this section is legally entitled to
use any substance, including alcohol, shall not constitute a defense against
any charge of violation of subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A laboratory test or tests for a controlled substance shall be inadmissible as
evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section upon a
finding by the court that the defendant consumed the substance under a valid
prescription from a practitioner, as defined in KRS 218A.010, acting in the
course of his or her professional practice. However, a laboratory test for a
controlled substance may be admissible as evidence in a prosecution under
subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.
(5) Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of
subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) For the first offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than two
hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be
imprisoned in the county jail for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor more
than thirty (30) days, or both. Following sentencing, the defendant may apply
to the judge for permission to enter a community labor program for not less
than forty-eight (48) hours nor more than thirty (30) days in lieu of fine or
imprisonment, or both. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
subsection (11) of this section are present while the person was operating or in
physical control of a motor vehicle, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be four (4) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(b) For the second offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1943
three hundred fifty dollars ($350) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500)
and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than seven (7) days nor
more than six (6) months and, in addition to fine and imprisonment, may be
sentenced to community labor for not less than ten (10) days nor more than
six (6) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection
(11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be fourteen (14) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(c) For a third offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than five
hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall
be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more
than twelve (12) months and may, in addition to fine and imprisonment, be
sentenced to community labor for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than
twelve (12) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in
subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of
imprisonment shall be sixty (60) days, which term shall not be suspended,
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early
release;
(d) 1. For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period, be:
a. Guilty of a Class D felony; and
b. Prohibited from purchasing alcohol during the period of license
suspension under KRS 189A.070 and for two (2) years following
the period of license suspension.
2. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this
section are present, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall
be two hundred forty (240) days, which term shall not be suspended,
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1943
probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of
release; and
(e) For purposes of this subsection, prior offenses shall include all convictions in
this state, and any other state or jurisdiction, for operating or being in control
of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other substances
that impair one's driving ability, or any combination of alcohol and such
substances, or while having an unlawful alcohol concentration, or driving
while intoxicated, but shall not include convictions for violating subsection
(1)(f) of this section. A court shall receive as proof of a prior conviction a
copy of that conviction, certified by the court ordering the conviction.
(6) Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be
fined no less than one hundred dollars ($100) and no more than five hundred dollars
($500), or sentenced to twenty (20) hours of community service in lieu of a fine. A
person subject to the penalties of this subsection shall not be subject to the penalties
established in subsection (5) of this section or any other penalty established
pursuant to KRS Chapter 189A, except those established in KRS 189A.040(1) and
KRS 189A.070.
(7) If the person is under the age of twenty-one (21) and there was an alcohol
concentration of 0.08 or greater[ based on the definition of alcohol concentration in
KRS 189A.005], the person shall be subject to the penalties established pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section.
(8) (a) For a second or third offense within a ten (10) year period, the minimum
sentence of imprisonment or community labor shall not be suspended,
probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release.
(b) For a fourth or subsequent offense under this section, the minimum term of
imprisonment shall be one hundred twenty (120) days, and this term shall not
be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1943
early release.
(c) For a second or subsequent offense, at least forty-eight (48) hours of the
mandatory sentence shall be served consecutively.
(9) When sentencing persons under subsection (5)(a) of this section, at least one (1) of
the penalties shall be assessed and that penalty shall not be suspended, probated, or
subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release.
(10) In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be
measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of
conviction were entered.
(11) For purposes of this section, aggravating circumstances are any one (1) or more of
the following:
(a) Operating a motor vehicle in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour above the
speed limit;
(b) Operating a motor vehicle in the wrong direction on a limited access highway;
(c) Operating a motor vehicle that causes an accident resulting in death or serious
physical injury as defined in KRS 500.080;
(d) Operating a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the operator's
blood or breath is 0.15 or more as measured by a test or tests of a sample of
the operator's blood or breath taken within two (2) hours of cessation of
operation of the motor vehicle;
(e) Refusing to submit to any test or tests of one's blood, breath, or urine
requested by an officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person was
operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of subsection
(1) of this section, except it shall not be considered an aggravating
circumstance for a first offense under subsection (5)(a) of this section; and
(f) Operating a motor vehicle that is transporting a passenger under the age of
twelve (12) years old.
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1943
(12) The substances applicable to a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section
are:
(a) Any Schedule I controlled substance except marijuana;
(b) Alprazolam;
(c) Amphetamine;
(d) Buprenorphine;
(e) Butalbital;
(f) Carisoprodol;
(g) Cocaine;
(h) Diazepam;
(i) Hydrocodone;
(j) Meprobamate;
(k) Methadone;
(l) Methamphetamine;
(m) Oxycodone;
(n) Promethazine;
(o) Propoxyphene; and
(p) Zolpidem.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 189A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any ignition interlock license issued under KRS 189A.340 or hardship license issued
under KRS 189A.410 for any person who is prohibited from purchasing alcohol after a
fourth or subsequent conviction of Section 1 of this Act shall contain:
(a) A prominent display of the language "No Alcohol Sale"; and
(b) Other security features identifying the person as being prohibited from
purchasing alcohol, including a prominent red stripe on the front of the license.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 507 IS CREATED TO
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1943
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person convicted of an
offense under this chapter in which the victim's death results from the
defendant's operation of a motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol, a
controlled substance, or other substance as described in Section 1 of this Act
shall be prohibited from purchasing alcohol:
(a) During any period of probation, shock probation, parole, conditional
discharge, or any other form of early release; and
(b) For two (2) years following any period of supervision described under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) The court shall:
(a) Designate in its judgment if the victim's death resulted from the defendant's
operation of a motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol, a controlled
substance, or other substance as described in Section 1 of this Act;
(b) Order the defendant to surrender his or her license to operate a motor
vehicle to the court. Should the defendant fail to surrender his or her
license to the court, the court shall issue an order directing the sheriff or
any other peace officer to seize the license immediately and deliver it to the
court. The court shall then forward the license to the Transportation
Cabinet; and
(c) Transmit the conviction records and other appropriate information to the
Transportation Cabinet.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 186.400 TO 186.640 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any person prohibited from purchasing alcohol upon a fourth or subsequent
conviction under Section 1 of this Act, or a conviction of an offense under Section 3 of
this Act in which the death results from the defendant's operation of a motor vehicle
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1943
under the influence of alcohol, a controlled substance, or other substance as described
in Section 1 of this Act, shall only be eligible for issuance of an operator's license that
contains:
(1) A prominent display of the language "No Alcohol Sale"; and
(2) Other security features identifying the person as being prohibited from
purchasing alcohol, including a prominent red stripe on the front of the license.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 244 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A retail licensee, or the licensee's agent, servant, or employee shall not knowingly sell,
give away, or deliver any alcoholic beverage, or knowingly procure or permit any
alcoholic beverage to be sold, given away, possessed by, or delivered to a person who is
prohibited from purchasing alcohol upon:
(1) A fourth or subsequent conviction under Section 1 of this Act; or
(2) A conviction of an offense under Section 3 of this Act in which the victim's death
results from the defendant's operation of a motor vehicle under the influence of
alcohol, a controlled substance, or other substance as described in Section 1 of
this Act.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 2/4/2026 10:43 AM Jacketed